Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-358
Borrower; right to action; licensee; judgment; effect.

Nothing in sections 45-351 and 45-353 shall limit a borrower's right to bring an action for damages. When the licensee has filed suit and obtained judgment, the licensee shall be permitted to resume contacts with the borrower against whom judgment has been obtained.

Laws 2025, LB474, § 79.